Utah statutes.
57-22-3.   Duties of owners and renters -- Generally.
(1)  Each owner and his agent renting or leasing a residential rental unit
shall maintain that unit in a condition fit for human habitation and in
accordance with local ordinances and the rules of the board of health having
jurisdiction in the area in which the residential rental unit is located.
Each residential rental unit shall have electrical systems, heating, plumbing,
and hot and cold water.
(2)  Each renter shall cooperate in maintaining his residential rental unit in
accordance with this chapter.
(3)  This chapter does not apply to breakage, malfunctions, or other
conditions which do not materially affect the physical health or safety of the
ordinary renter.
(4)  Any duty in this act may be allocated to a different party by explicit
written agreement signed by the parties.
